New York, session 2025-2026, A10909.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Shirley 2 Myers White Right To Reconciliation and Digital Identity Repair Act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings. The legislature finds and declares that: 4 1. In modern society, individuals are increasingly governed not only 5 by formal legal outcomes, but by persistent narratives introduced and 6 amplified through journalism, digital platforms, automated systems, and 7 institutional records. 8 2. When allegations, arrests, or adverse events are reported or 9 recorded, they often receive prominent and lasting visibility, while 10 resolutions such as acquittals, dismissals, or exonerations receive 11 little or no corresponding prominence. 12 3. The continued circulation of outdated, incomplete, or disproven 13 narratives can cause ongoing and disproportionate harm, including but 14 not limited to: 15 (a) barriers to employment, education, and housing; 16 (b) compromised personal safety and social standing; 17 (c) psychological distress and reputational damage; and 18 (d) structural exclusion through automated screening systems. 19 4. Advances in artificial intelligence, search algorithms, and auto- 20 mated decision-making tools have intensified this harm by scaling 21 outdated information, often without transparency, context, or a mech- 22 anism for correction. 23 5. Modern indexing and artificial intelligence systems materially 24 affect how narratives persist and influence decision-making. 25 6. Search engines, automated background checks, data aggregators, and 26 screening tools rely on indexed digital information to assess credibili- 27 ty, eligibility, and risk. These systems do not independently verify EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14691-01-6 A. 10909 2 1 accuracy, context, or legal resolution; they surface and prioritize 2 information based on availability and perceived relevance. 3 7. When arrests, allegations, or adverse events are indexed without 4 corresponding updates reflecting resolution or correction, automated 5 systems may continue to treat incomplete narratives as current truth. In 6 this environment, unresolved narratives can quietly govern access to 7 employment, housing, education, safety, and social participation long 8 after legal systems have corrected themselves. 9 8. In some instances, individuals or institutions vested with authori- 10 ty continue to assert or maintain narratives that contradict adjudicated 11 legal outcomes, resulting in narrative abuse by authority and undermin- 12 ing trust in public systems. 13 9. Social workers, legal practitioners, educators, and community advo- 14 cates routinely encounter individuals whose lives remain constrained by 15 narratives that no longer reflect legal truth or present reality. 16 10. Accountability and public safety are essential; however, justice 17 does not end at disposition, and ethical systems must distinguish 18 between accountability and permanent narrative punishment. The absence 19 of a clear, consistent right to reconciliation and digital identity 20 repair across systems creates inequity, erodes trust, and perpetuates 21 harm inconsistent with principles of dignity, proportionality, and 22 integrity. 23 § 3. Legislative purpose. 1. The purpose of this act is to: 24 (a) establish a right to reconciliation and digital identity repair 25 for individuals whose legal matters have been resolved, or whose circum- 26 stances have materially changed; 27 (b) ensure that narratives introduced by institutions are accompanied 28 by mechanisms for accuracy, context, update, and completion; 29 (c) prevent individuals from being permanently governed by biased, 30 outdated, incomplete, or authority-enforced narratives; 31 (d) create system-appropriate obligations across distinct domains 32 where narrative harm occurs, while preserving accountability, public 33 safety, and freedom of the press; and 34 (e) affirm reconciliation as a matter of systems integrity, not pref- 35 erential treatment. 36 2. This act further recognizes that reconciliation must extend beyond 37 formal legal disposition into the indexed and automated systems that now 38 shape real-world outcomes. When institutions correct themselves, those 39 corrections must be capable of traveling with the narrative into the 40 systems that rely on digital identity to make consequential decisions. 41 § 4. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 296-e to 42 read as follows: 43 § 296-e. Right to reconciliation and digital identity repair. 1. For 44 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 45 meanings: 46 (a) "Narrative" means any public or institutional representation, 47 either written, visual, digital, or automated, that describes, charac- 48 terizes, or implies an individual's conduct, risk, character, or status. 49 (b) "Narrative harm" means material harm resulting from the persist- 50 ence, amplification, or enforcement of a narrative that is inaccurate, 51 outdated, incomplete, or disproportionate to verified facts or adjudi- 52 cated outcomes. 53 (c) "Reconciliation" means the process by which narratives are 54 corrected, contextualized, or completed to reflect current legal truth 55 and material reality. A. 10909 3 1 (d) "Digital identity repair" means reasonable measures taken to 2 ensure that an individual's digital presence does not materially misrep- 3 resent their legal status or factual circumstances. 4 (e) "Narrative abuse by authority" means the continued assertion or 5 circulation of a disproven, exaggerated, or outdated narrative by an 6 individual or institution vested with formal authority, despite evidence 7 or adjudication to the contrary. 8 (f) "Disposition" means an acquittal, dismissal, exoneration, 9 completion of sentence, or any final legal resolution. 10 2. The right to reconciliation shall apply across the following 11 domains, each with system-appropriate obligations: 12 (a) Journalism and media; narrative introduction without completion. 13 (i) Media entities that publish information regarding arrests, allega- 14 tions, or criminal proceedings shall establish procedures to: 15 (1) update or contextualize coverage when legal outcomes materially 16 change; 17 (2) ensure that resolutions receive reasonable visibility comparable 18 to initial reporting; and 19 (3) mitigate ongoing harm when continued publication no longer serves 20 a legitimate public interest. 21 (ii) This section shall not require removal of historical records, but 22 shall affirm the responsibility to restore accuracy and context. 23 (b) Artificial intelligence and automated systems; narrative amplifi- 24 cation without stewardship. Entities utilizing automated tools for 25 screening, ranking, or decision-making shall: 26 (i) provide notice when adverse decisions rely on automated narrative 27 sources; 28 (ii) allow for the correction of materially inaccurate or outdated 29 information; and 30 (iii) ensure human review when narrative harm is alleged. 31 (c) Hiring, housing and opportunity systems; pre-adjudication exclu- 32 sion. (i) Employers, housing providers, and institutions shall not rely 33 solely on uncontextualized narratives where legal resolution or 34 correction is available. 35 (ii) Individuals shall have the right to: 36 (1) understand adverse decisions based on narrative information; 37 (2) submit documentation of reconciliation or resolution; and 38 (3) request reconsideration where appropriate. 39 (d) Law enforcement and judicial adjacency; narrative abuse by author- 40 ity. (i) Following legal disposition, no authority shall knowingly main- 41 tain or disseminate narratives that materially contradict adjudicated 42 outcomes. 43 (ii) Agencies and entities shall implement safeguards to ensure 44 records, statements, and communications reflect legal truth and propor- 45 tionality. 46 (e) Digital life, relationships and social opportunity; narrative 47 compression in everyday life. (i) Individuals shall have access to 48 reasonable mechanisms to contest and correct materially harmful digital 49 narratives that misrepresent resolved matters. 50 (ii) Digital platforms shall be encouraged to support contextualiza- 51 tion and dispute resolution consistent with this section. 52 (iii) Social media platforms, as such term is defined pursuant to 53 subdivision five of section eleven hundred of the general business law, 54 shall remove any accusations about an individual that are not factual 55 and may jeopardize such individual's reputation. 56 3. (a) Nothing in this section shall be construed to: A. 10909 4 1 (i) erase accountability for harm; 2 (ii) interfere with lawful investigations; 3 (iii) suppress lawful speech; 4 (iv) require false statements or misrepresentation of facts; 5 (v) regulate or restrict freedom of speech, personal expression, or 6 private communication; or 7 (vi) regulate social media platforms, search engines, or third-party 8 technology providers, or to require such entities to remove, suppress, 9 or alter content. 10 (b) Responsibilities under this section shall apply solely to the 11 institution, agency, or entity that originated, authorized, or main- 12 tained the official narrative or record at issue, including content 13 published on official websites, press releases, public records, or 14 institutional social media accounts. 15 4. The division of human rights shall develop guidance consistent with 16 this section and shall consult with stakeholders, including social work 17 professionals, legal experts, and civil liberties organizations in the 18 development of such guidance. 19 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.